California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
 identify the applicable fiscal year in which the scope change occurred.

(2) The two worksheets to the Change in Scope-of-Service Request form summarizing the health center’s health care practitioners and services for the applicable fiscal year or years.

(e) Change in Scope-of-Service Request forms for changes occurring prior to July 1, 2005, shall be filed with the department no later than July 1, 2006, and shall be deemed to have been filed only when both the Medi-Cal cost report for the applicable period and the referenced Change in Scope-of-Service Request form worksheets have been filed with the department. The date of filing shall be the date on which either the Medi-Cal cost report or the referenced Change in Scope-of-Service Request forms are received by the department, whichever is later.

(f) Notwithstanding
 Section 14132.107, the department shall calculate a tentative scope-of-service rate adjustment based on 80 percent of the difference in the “as reported” scope-of-service per visit cost. This adjustment shall occur no later than 150 days after receipt of the Medi-Cal cost report and the referenced Change in Scope-of-Service Request forms. Within 12 months after receipt of request forms, the department shall complete its FQHC fiscal year audit of the Medi-Cal cost report and associated Change in Scope-of-Service Request and final rate adjustment pursuant to that audit. The final rate adjustment will be retroactive to July 1, 2005. Nothing in this subdivision shall be construed to extend the time period for review and finalization of cost reports as set forth in Section 14170.

(g) The department shall, by no later than March 30, 2006, promptly seek all necessary federal approvals in order to implement this section, including any amendments to the
 state plan. To the extent that any element or requirement of this section is not approved, the department shall submit a request to the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services for any waivers that would be necessary to implement this section.

(h) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, and only to the extent that all necessary federal approvals are obtained and there is an appropriation for the purposes of implementing this section, the department may implement this section without taking any regulatory action and by means of a provider bulletin or similar instructions.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 548, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

14132.107.

Claims for reimbursement under subdivision (e) of Section 14132.100 shall be finalized by the department within 150 days of receipt of the claims for reimbursement. These claims for reimbursement shall be paid within 30 days of being finalized by the department. However, the payment of those amounts that are disputed shall be subject to the requirements, timeframes, and procedures specified in Section 14171. Scope changes going forward shall be finalized within 90 days of receipt and paid within 30 days of being finalized by the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 228, Sec. 21.   Effective August 16, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

14132.108.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, requests for rate adjustments for scope-of-service rate changes under paragraph (4) of subdivision (e) of Section 14132.100 for an FQHC’s or RHC’s fiscal year ending in 2004 shall be deemed to have been filed in a timely manner so long as it is filed within 90 days following the end of the 150-day timeframe applicable to scope-of-service changes occurring from January 1, 2001, to the end of an FQHC’s or RHC’s 2003 fiscal year, as specified in paragraph (6) of subdivision (e) of Section 14132.100.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 228, Sec. 22.   Effective August 16, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

14132.11.

(a) Commencing on July 1, 2024, pharmacogenomic testing shall be a covered benefit under the Medi-Cal program, subject to utilization controls and evidence-based clinical practice guidelines.

(b) “Pharmacogenomic testing” means laboratory genetic testing that includes, but is not limited to, a panel test, to identify how a person’s genetics may impact the efficacy, toxicity, and safety of medications.

(c) This section shall be implemented only to the extent that any necessary federal approvals have been obtained and federal financial participation is available and not otherwise jeopardized.

(d) Notwithstanding
 Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department may implement, interpret, or make specific this section by means of all-county letters, plan letters, plan or provider bulletins, or similar instructions, without taking any further regulatory action.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 329, Sec. 2.   (AB 425)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

14132.13.

(a) Services provided by a community paramedicine program, triage to alternate destination program, or mobile integrated health program are covered benefits under the Medi-Cal program.

(b) The department shall develop rates of reimbursement for services provided by a community paramedicine program, triage to alternate destination program, or mobile integrated health program in consultation with community paramedicine programs, triage to alternate destination programs, and mobile integrated health programs.

(c) This section shall be implemented only to the extent that the department obtains any
 necessary federal waivers or other federal approvals and that federal financial participation is available and not otherwise jeopardized.

(d) Implementation of this section shall be subject to an appropriation made by the Legislature for the purpose of this section.

(e) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Community paramedicine program” means a program defined in Section 1815 of the Health and Safety Code.

(2) “Mobile integrated health program” means a team of licensed health care practitioners, operating within their scope of practice, who provide mobile health services to support the emergency medical services
 system.

(3) “Triage to alternate destination program” means a program defined in Section 1819 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 884, Sec. 3.   (SB 1180)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

14132.14.

(a) Federal Food and Drug Administration-approved treatments for menopausal symptoms are covered benefits under the Medi-Cal program, subject to medical necessity. These include all of the following:

(1) Hormone therapy, including combination estrogen and hormone medicines, combination estrogen and progestin medicines, estrogen-only and progestin-only medicines, vaginal estrogen, and topical hormone therapy. This does not include glucagon-like peptide-1 or glucagon-like peptide-1 receptor agonists used solely for weight loss.

(2) Low-dose antidepressants.

(3) Anticonvulsants.

(4) Medications to prevent or treat osteoporosis.

(5) Nonhormonal medications for vasomotor-related symptoms.

(b) The department shall establish and maintain a policy to reimburse providers for provision of services related to menopause care, including services integrated with primary care and obstetrician-gynecologist services. The policy shall consider current clinical care recommendations from the Menopause Society or other nationally recognized professional association, and shall identify billing codes for services commonly used to treat symptoms resulting from menopause.

(c) Coverage pursuant to this subdivision shall be provided without discrimination on the basis of gender expression or identity.

(d) For purposes of this section, “menopause” includes perimenopause, menopause, and postmenopause.

(e) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department may implement this section by means of all-county letters, plan letters, plan or provider bulletins, or similar instructions, without taking any further regulatory action.

(f) This section shall be implemented only to the extent that any necessary federal approvals are obtained, and federal financial participation is available and not otherwise jeopardized.

(History: Added by Stats. 2026, Ch. 27, Sec. 86.   (SB 164)   Effective June 29, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

14132.15.

For purposes of subdivision (p) of Section 14132, “rehabilitation services” means services intended to assist physically or cognitively impaired persons to achieve or regain their maximum functional potential for mobility, self-care, and independent living.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1360, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

14132.16.

Mammography for screening or diagnostic purposes upon the referral of a patient’s physician shall be covered under this chapter on or after January 1, 1988, to the extent required or permitted by federal law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 550, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

14132.17.

Annual cervical cancer tests for screening or diagnostic purposes, upon the referral of a patient’s physician, is a covered benefit under this chapter, on or after January 1, 1991, to the extent required or permitted by federal law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1279, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

14132.171.

(a) (1) An annual cognitive health assessment for Medi-Cal beneficiaries who are 65 years of age or older is a covered benefit if they are otherwise ineligible for a similar assessment as part of an annual wellness visit under the Medicare Program. Subject to paragraph (3), the department shall provide reimbursement to a Medi-Cal provider who renders this service.

(2) The payment for the cognitive health assessment developed pursuant to paragraph (1) shall only be available upon appropriation by the Legislature for these purposes.

(3) (A) A Medi-Cal provider shall only be eligible to receive the payment for the benefit specified in paragraph (1) if
 the provider
 conducts the cognitive health assessment using validated tools, as recommended by the department.

(B) (i) The department shall determine the cognitive health assessment validated tools, as described in subparagraph (A), in consultation with the State
 Department of Public Health’s Alzheimer’s Disease Program (Article 4 (commencing with Section 125275) of Chapter 2 of Part 5 of Division 106 of the Health and Safety Code), that program’s 10 California Alzheimer’s Disease Centers, representatives of primary care physician specialties, including, but not limited to, family medicine, and the Alzheimer’s Disease and Related Disorders Advisory Committee of the California Health and Human Services Agency (Chapter 3.1 (commencing with Section 1568.15) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code).

(ii) With respect to the validated tools, the department shall select multiple tools. To improve overall accessibility of these tools and minimize access barriers, at least one of those tools shall not carry any restrictions on copyright or trademark.

(b) An annual cognitive health assessment shall identify signs of Alzheimer’s disease or
 dementia, consistent with the standards for detecting cognitive impairment under the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services and the recommendations by the American Academy of Neurology.

(c) By January 1, 2024, the department shall do both of the following:

(1) Consolidate and analyze the data on the administration of the cognitive health assessment in the Medi-Cal managed care and fee-for-service delivery systems.

(2) Post information on the utilization of, and payment for, this benefit on its internet website.

(d) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government
 Code, the department may implement this section, in whole or in part, by means of all-plan letters, provider bulletins, or similar instructions, without taking any further regulatory action.

(e) This section shall be implemented only to the extent any necessary federal approvals are obtained and federal financial participation is available.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 21, Sec. 105.   (AB 116)   Effective June 30, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

14132.18.

(a) Community supported living arrangement services approved by the United States Department of Health and Human Services in accordance with Section 1396v of Title 42 of the United States Code is a covered benefit under this chapter to the extent that federal financial participation is available for those services and shall be subject to the terms, conditions, and duration of any waiver obtained from the Secretary of the United States Department of Health and Human Services. 

(b) (1) The department, in consultation with the State Department of Developmental Services, shall submit an application to the secretary for approval to provide community supported living arrangement services and seek any federal waivers necessary to implement this subdivision. 

(2) State matching funds for the federal medicaid funding shall come out of purchase of services funds of the regional centers, established pursuant to Article 1 (commencing with Section 4620) of Chapter 5 of Division 4.5 and it is the intent of the Legislature that no new funds from the General Fund shall be appropriated for this purpose.

(c) The department, in consultation with the State Department of Developmental Services, shall establish and maintain program standards for quality assurance and minimum protection to protect the health, safety, and welfare of individuals receiving community
 supported living arrangement services and as otherwise necessary to implement this section. 

(d) In order to facilitate the design and development of community supported living arrangement services; program regulations implementing, interpreting, or making specific the provisions of subdivision (a) shall not be subject to Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code. This subdivision shall become inoperative on January 1, 1997. 

(e) If the provision of community supported living arrangements as a covered benefit under this chapter receive federal approval, the department shall collect patient-specific cost data and compare the costs of providing community supported living arrangements under this chapter with the costs experienced prior to the provision of community supported living arrangements as a covered benefit under
 this chapter. 

(f) This section shall cease to be operative if the Director of Health Services determines (1) California’s application for federal funds under the community supported living arrangements medicaid state plan option is not accepted; (2) California’s application for renewal of funding for community supported living arrangements is not accepted during the course of the grant; (3) federal funding for community supported living arrangements ceases to be available; or (4) California determines that it no longer chooses to participate in the community supported living arrangements medicaid state plan option.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 735, Sec. 6.   Conditionally inoperative by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

14132.19.

(a) (1) The department, in consultation with the State Department of Social Services, county mental health experts, managed care plan experts, behavioral health experts, child welfare experts, and stakeholders, shall convene an advisory working group to update, amend, or develop, if appropriate, tools and protocols for the screening of children for trauma, within the Early and Periodic Screening, Diagnosis, and Treatment (EPSDT) benefit, consistent with existing law and this section. The advisory working group shall consider both of the following:

(A) Existing screening tools used in the Medi-Cal program, including, but not limited to,
 the Staying Healthy Assessment developed by the department, the United States Preventive Services Task Force grade “A” or “B” recommendations, and the American Academy of Pediatrics Bright Futures periodicity schedule and anticipatory guidance.

(B) The efficacy and appropriateness of the types of providers authorized to administer screenings.

(2) The department shall convene the advisory working group by
 May 1, 2018. The advisory working group shall report its findings and recommendations, as well as any appropriations necessary to implement those recommendations, to the department and to the Legislature’s budget subcommittees on health and human services no later than May 1, 2019. The advisory working group shall be disbanded on December 31, 2019.

(3) Findings or recommendations of the advisory working group that cannot be implemented without a subsequent appropriation by the Legislature, as determined by the department, shall not be implemented until the appropriation is made.

(4) On or before May 1, 2019, the department shall identify an existing advisory working group to periodically review and consider the protocols for the screening
 of trauma in children consistent with subparagraphs (A) and (B) of paragraph (1). The group created pursuant to this section may, as part of its work, recommend to the department an existing group appropriate to conduct this review. The advisory working group identified by department shall review and consider the protocols for the screening of trauma in children at least once every five years, or upon the request of the department.

(b) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department may implement, interpret, or make specific this section by means of all-county letters, plan letters, plan or provider
 bulletins, or similar instructions, without taking regulatory action.

(c) This section shall be implemented only if and to the extent that federal financial participation under Title XIX of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396 et seq.) is not jeopardized and all necessary federal approvals have been obtained.

(d) “Trauma,” as used in this section, means the result of an event, series of events, or set of circumstances that is experienced by an individual as physically or emotionally harmful or threatening and that has lasting adverse effects on the individual’s functioning and physical, social, emotional, or spiritual well-being.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 700, Sec. 1.   (AB 340)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

14132.195.

(a) Consistent with federal law, screening services provided as an Early and Periodic Screening, Diagnostic, and Treatment (EPSDT) benefit pursuant to subdivision (v) of Section 14132 shall include developmental screening services for individuals zero to three years of age, inclusive.

(b) Medi-Cal managed care plans shall ensure, and monitor compliance with, both of the following:

(1) Developmental screening services provided by providers who contract with Medi-Cal managed care plans comply with the periodicity schedule and the standardized and validated developmental screening tools that are
 established by the Bright Futures Guidelines and Recommendations for Preventive Pediatric Health Care, as established by the American Academy of Pediatrics, and by any future updates to this material.

(2) Developmental screening tools administered by providers who contract with Medi-Cal managed care plans are administered in their entirety, and in adherence to, the specific tools’ recommended guidelines.

(c) This section does not limit or restrict the scope of the EPSDT benefit, as required to be provided to eligible Medi-Cal beneficiaries under 21 years of age pursuant to Section 1396d(r) of Title 42 of the United
 States Code.

(d) This section does not limit or restrict blood lead screenings required under Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 105275) of Part 5 of Division 103 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 387, Sec. 2.   (AB 1004)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

14132.20.

(a) The department shall establish a program to provide continuous skilled nursing care to persons with developmental disabilities as a benefit of the Medi-Cal program, when those services are provided in accordance with an approved federal waiver or Medi-Cal State Plan amendment meeting the requirements of subdivision (b). “Continuous skilled nursing care” means medically necessary care provided by, or under the supervision of, a registered nurse within his or her scope of practice, seven days a week, 24 hours per
 day, in a facility participating in the program. Continuous skilled nursing care shall include a minimum of eight hours per day provided by or under the direct supervision of a registered nurse. Each facility providing continuous skilled nursing care in the program shall have a minimum of one registered nurse or one licensed vocational nurse awake and in the facility at all times when a consumer is present.

(b) The department shall submit to the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services, a request, developed in consultation with the State Department of Public Health, the State Department of Developmental Services, and the Association of Regional Center Agencies, to provide continuous skilled nursing care services under a federal waiver pursuant to Section 1915(c) of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396n(c)) or pursuant to a Medi-Cal State Plan amendment.

(c) (1) The program shall provide continuous skilled nursing care to persons with developmental disabilities in the least restrictive home-like setting.

(2) Participation in the program shall be restricted to facilities that meet all eligibility requirements. The facilities shall be approved by the department, in consultation with the State Department of Public Health, the State Department of Developmental Services, and the appropriate regional center agencies, and shall meet the requirements of subdivision (f).

(d) Under the program established by this section, a person with developmental disabilities shall be eligible to receive continuous skilled nursing care if all of the following conditions are met:

(1) The person with developmental disabilities meets the criteria specified in
 the federal waiver or the Medi-Cal State Plan amendment.

(2) The person with developmental disabilities resides in a facility that meets the provider participation criteria as specified in the federal waiver or the Medi-Cal State Plan amendment.

(3) The continuous skilled nursing care services are provided in accordance with the federal waiver or the Medi-Cal State Plan amendment.

(e) The services provided to persons with developmental disabilities under the program, pursuant to Section 1915(c) of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396n(c)), shall not result in costs that exceed the fiscal limit established in the federal waiver.

(f) A facility seeking to participate in the program shall provide care for persons with developmental
 disabilities who require the availability of continuous skilled nursing care in accordance with the terms of the federal waiver or the Medi-Cal State Plan amendment. During participation in the program, the facility shall comply with all the terms and conditions of the federal waiver or the Medi-Cal State Plan amendment.

(g) In implementing this article, the department may enter into contracts for the provision of essential administration and other services. Contracts entered into under this section may be on a noncompetitive bid basis and shall be exempt from the requirements of Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 10290) of Part 2 of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code.

(h) This section shall not become operative unless and until the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services approve a federal waiver pursuant to Section 1915(c) of the Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec.
 1396n(c)) or approve a Medi-Cal State Plan amendment to implement the program authorized by this section. If the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services provide the aforementioned approval, the Director of Health Care Services shall execute a declaration stating that this approval has been granted. The director shall retain the declaration and this section shall become operative on the date that the director executes a declaration pursuant to this subdivision.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, 4th Ex. Sess., Ch. 5, Sec. 44.   Effective July 28, 2009.   Conditionally operative as provided in subd. (h).)
-------------------------------------------

14132.21.

The department shall assess the feasibility of applying to the federal Health Care Financing Administration for a Medicaid State Plan amendment to provide targeted case management to pregnant substance-abusing women and women who have given birth to a drug-exposed or alcohol-exposed infant. These women may be identified through self-referral, family planning or health clinics, public or private hospitals, drug treatment programs, the Medi-Cal program, or other public assistance or health treatment programs. Women eligible for services under the targeted case management program would be provided the following case management services:

(a) Intake and service needs assessment of women currently receiving
 Medi-Cal benefits.

(b) Development of a coordinated health and treatment plan for the eligible woman and her infant, listing needed services.

(c) Case management services to assist with gaining access to needed medical, social, educational, and other services.

(d) Referral to any of the following programs that are listed in the woman’s health and treatment plan:

(1) Child Health and Disability Prevention Program.

(2) Supplementary Food Program for Women, Infants, and Children (WIC).

(3) Drug abuse treatment and detoxification programs.

(4) In-home support
 services to enhance the woman’s utilization of drug treatment programs, and prenatal and perinatal care services.

(5) Transportation to health and drug treatment services.

(6) Crisis assistance to address health and drug treatment needs.

(7) Other case management services authorized by the federal Health Care Financing Administration.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 22, Sec. 103.   (AB 75)   Effective June 27, 2013.   Operative July 1, 2013, by Sec. 110 of Ch. 22.)
-------------------------------------------

14132.22.

(a) For purposes of this section, dental restorative materials are limited to composite resin, glass ionomer cement, resin ionomer cement, and amalgam, as described on the Dental Board of California’s dental materials factsheet.

(b) A provider of services that includes the provision of dental restorative materials to a beneficiary under this chapter may recommend, after consultation with the beneficiary, a dental restorative material other than the covered benefit of
 amalgam.

(c) A provider may claim and receive the reimbursement rate for an amalgam restoration when using a different dental restorative material.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 183, Sec. 386.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

14132.23.

(a) (1) Except as set forth in paragraph (2), and notwithstanding any other provision of law or regulation, the active and retentive phases of orthodontic treatment covered under the Medi-Cal program shall be reimbursed on a quarterly basis, as determined by dividing the sum of the authorized treatment allowances by the estimated number of three-month periods that the patient’s treatment will require, subject to the department’s utilization controls.

(2) The retentive phase of orthodontic treatment shall be reimbursed pursuant to paragraph (1) only until the department implements the Code on Dental Procedures and Nomenclature, as published by the American Dental Association in its Current Dental Terminology manual, at which time paragraph (1) shall not apply to retentive phase orthodontic services that are covered under the Medi-Cal program.

(b) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2008.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 494, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2008.   Section operative July 1, 2008, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

14132.25.

(a) On or before July 1, 1983, the State Department of Health Care Services shall establish a subacute care program in health facilities in order to more effectively use the limited Medi-Cal dollars available while at the same time ensuring needed services for these patients. The subacute care program shall be available to patients in health facilities who meet subacute care criteria. Subacute care may
 be provided by any facility designated by the director as meeting the subacute care criteria that has an approved provider participation agreement with the department.

(b) The department shall develop a rate of reimbursement for this subacute care program. Reimbursement rates shall be determined in accordance with methodology developed by the department, specified in regulation, and may include the following:

(1) All-inclusive per diem rates.

(2) Individual patient-specific rates according to the needs of the individual subacute care patient.

(3) Other rates subject to negotiation with the health facility.

(c) Reimbursement at subacute care rates, as specified in subdivision (b), shall
 only be implemented if funds are available for this purpose pursuant to the annual Budget Act.

(d) The department may negotiate and execute an agreement with any health facility that meets the standards for providing subacute care. An agreement may be negotiated or established between the health facility and the department for subacute care based on individual patient assessment. The department shall establish level of care criteria and appropriate utilization controls for patients eligible for the subacute care program.

(e) For the purposes of this section, pediatric subacute services are the health care services needed by a person under 21 years of age who uses a medical technology that compensates for the loss of a vital bodily function.

(f) Medical necessity for pediatric subacute care services shall be
 substantiated in any one of the following ways:

(1) A tracheostomy with dependence on mechanical ventilation for a minimum of six hours each day.

(2) Dependence on tracheostomy care requiring suctioning at least every six hours, and room air mist or oxygen as needed, and dependence on one of the five treatment procedures listed in subparagraphs (B) to (F), inclusive:

(A) Dependence on intermittent suctioning at least every eight hours and room air mist and oxygen as needed.

(B) Dependence on continuous intravenous therapy, including administration of a therapeutic agent necessary for hydration or of intravenous pharmaceuticals, or intravenous pharmaceutical administration of more than one agent, via a peripheral or central line, without continuous
 infusion.

(C) Dependence on peritoneal dialysis treatments requiring at least four exchanges every 24 hours.

(D) Dependence on tube feeding by means of a nasogastric or gastrostomy tube.

(E) Dependence on other medical technologies required continuously, which, in the opinion of the attending physician and the Medi-Cal consultant, require the services of a professional nurse.

(F) Dependence on biphasic positive airway pressure at least six hours a day, including assessment or intervention every three hours and lacking either cognitive or physical ability of the patient to protect his or her airway.

(3) Dependence on total parenteral nutrition or other intravenous nutritional support, and
 dependence on one of the treatment procedures specified in subparagraphs (A) to (F), inclusive, of paragraph (2).

(4) Dependence on skilled nursing care in the administration of any three of the six treatment procedures specified in subparagraphs (A) to (F), inclusive, of paragraph (2).

(5) Dependence on biphasic positive airway pressure or continuous positive airway pressure at least six hours a day, including assessment or intervention every three hours and lacking either cognitive or physical ability of the patient to protect his or her airway and dependence on one of the five treatment procedures specified in subparagraphs (A) to (E), inclusive, of paragraph (2).

(g) The medical necessity determination outlined in subdivision (f) is intended solely for the evaluation of a patient who is potentially eligible and
 meets the criteria to be transferred from an acute care setting to a subacute level of care.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 294, Sec. 2.   (AB 667)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

14132.26.

(a) The department shall develop a program that requires a waiver of federal law to test the efficacy of providing an assisted living benefit to beneficiaries under the Medi-Cal program. Assisted living benefits shall include, but are not limited to, the care and supervision activities specified in Section 1569.2 of the Health and Safety Code and Section 87101 of Title 22 of the California Code of Regulations, and other health-related services. The program developed pursuant to this section shall be known as the waiver program for purposes of this section. The department shall submit any necessary waiver applications or modifications to the Medicaid
 state plan to the
 federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services to implement the waiver program, and shall implement the waiver program only to the extent federal financial participation is available.

(b) The department shall develop the waiver program in conjunction with other state departments, consumers, consumer advocates, housing and service providers, and experts in the fields of gerontology, geriatric health, nursing services, and independent living.

(c) The assisted living benefit shall be designed to provide eligible individuals with a range of services that enable them to remain in the least restrictive and most homelike environment while receiving the medical and personal care necessary to protect their health and well-being. Benefits provided pursuant to this waiver program shall include only those not otherwise available under the state
 plan, and may include, but are not limited to, medicine management, coordination with a primary health care provider, and case management.

(d) (1) Eligible individuals shall be those who are eligible for the Medi-Cal program and are determined by the department to be eligible for placement in a nursing facility, as defined under subdivisions (c) and (d) of Section 1250 of the Health and Safety Code. Eligibility shall be based on an assessment of an individual’s ability to perform functional and instrumental activities of daily living, as well as the individual’s medical diagnosis and prognosis, and other criteria, including other Medi-Cal services that the beneficiary is receiving, as specified in the waiver.

(2) An eligible individual shall participate in the waiver program only if
 they are fully informed of the program and the nature of the assisted living benefit and indicates in writing their choice to participate.

(e) (1) The waiver program shall test the effectiveness of providing a Medi-Cal assisted living benefit through two service delivery approaches, as specified in paragraphs (2) and (3).

(2) Under the first model, an assisted living benefit shall be provided to residents of licensed residential care facilities. Facility participation in the program shall be determined by the department in conjunction with the State Department of Social Services and in accordance with the criteria for
 participation specified in the waiver. Under this model the facility operator shall be responsible for the provision of services allowed under the benefit, either directly or through contracts with other provider agencies, as permitted and specified in the waiver. During participation in the waiver program, residential care facilities shall comply with all terms and conditions of the waiver. The department and the State Department of Social Services, may, as determined necessary and appropriate, waive provisions contained in Division 2 (commencing with Section 1200) of the Health and Safety Code, subdivision (h) of Section 14132.95, and Title 22 of the California Code of Regulations for facilities providing services to waiver program participants.

(3) Under the second model, an assisted living benefit shall be provided to residents in publicly funded senior and disabled housing projects. Under this model an independent agency, pursuant to a
 contract with the department, shall be responsible for the provision of case management and other services to eligible individuals, as specified in the waiver.

(f) The department shall evaluate the effectiveness of the waiver program.

(1) The evaluation shall include, but not be limited to, participant satisfaction, health, and safety, the quality of life of the participant receiving the assisted living benefit, and demonstration of the cost neutrality of the waiver program as specified in federal guidelines.

(2) The evaluation shall estimate the projected savings, if any, in the budgets of state and local governments if the program was expanded statewide.

(3) The evaluation shall be submitted to the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the
 Legislature on or before January 1, 2003.

(g) The department shall limit the number of participants in the waiver program during the initial three years of its operation to a number that will be statistically significant for purposes of the program evaluation and that meets any requirements of the federal Health Care Financing Administration, including a request to waive statewide implementation requirements for the waiver program during the initial years of evaluation.

(h) In implementing this section, the department may enter into contracts for the provision of essential administrative and other services. Contracts entered into under this section may be on a noncompetitive bid basis, and shall be exempt from the requirements of Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 10290) of Part 2 of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code.

(i) The department shall not implement the waiver program specified in subdivision (a) if the benefits provided pursuant to the waiver program will result in additional costs to the Medi-Cal program.

(j) The waiver program shall be developed and implemented only to the extent that funds are appropriated or otherwise available for that purpose.

(k) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department may implement, interpret, or make specific this section, in whole or in part, by means of all-county letters, plan letters, provider bulletins, information notices, or other similar instructions, without taking any further regulatory action.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 252, Sec. 26.   (AB 173)   Effective September 18, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

14132.27.
